District of Columbia statutes.
2-1217.77

Issuance of Bonds.

The issuance of Bonds, including any refunding Bonds, is authorized pursuant to § 1-204.90 to finance Retail Development Costs of TIF Areas certified by the Mayor pursuant to this subchapter. This subchapter constitutes an act of Council authorizing the issuance of Bonds, including refunding Bonds, as required by § 1-204.90. The Bonds shall be secured by Tax Increment Revenues in amounts not to exceed the limits provided for in this subchapter or other security authorized by this subchapter. The issuance of Bonds, including any refunding Bonds in specified aggregate principal amounts, shall be approved by the Mayor in accordance with this subchapter.

Sept. 8, 2004, D.C. Law 15-185, § 8, 51 DCR 5941